District of Columbia statutes.
10-161

Theodore Roosevelt Island — Designation.

In all public documents, records, and maps of the United States in which such island is designated or referred to it shall be designated as “Theodore Roosevelt Island.”

History

Feb. 11, 1933, 47 Stat. 799, ch. 48, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-161.
1973 Ed., § 8-167.